Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF16.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1742XS (3) 91 jda/jh S.F. 16 Section 1. Section 275.24, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 275.24 Effective date of change. 3 1. When a school district is enlarged, reorganized, or 4 changes its boundary If a proposition to enlarge, reorganize, 5 or change the boundary of a school district pursuant to 6 sections 275.12 through 275.18 , 275.20 , and 275.22 , is approved 7 by voters pursuant to section 275.18 prior to January 1, 2025, 8 the change shall take effect on July 1 following the date of 9 the reorganization election held pursuant to section 275.18 . 10 2. If a proposition to enlarge, reorganize, or change the 11 boundary of a school district pursuant to sections 275.12 12 through 275.18, 275.20, and 275.22, is approved by voters 13 pursuant to section 275.18 on or after January 1, 2025, 14 the change shall take effect on July 1 in the calendar year 15 immediately subsequent to the calendar year in which the 16 reorganization election was held pursuant to section 275.18. 17 Sec. 2. Section 275.55, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 4. a. (1) The If the proposition was approved by voters 20 pursuant to this section prior to January 1, 2025, the 21 attachment is effective July 1 following its approval. 22 (2) If the proposition was approved by voters pursuant to 23 this section on or after January 1, 2025, the attachment is 24 effective July 1 in the calendar year immediately subsequent to 25 the calendar year in which the attachment was approved. 26 b. If the dissolution proposal is for the dissolution of 27 a school district with a certified enrollment of fewer than 28 six hundred, the territory located in the school district that 29 dissolved is eligible, if approved by the director of the 30 department of education, for a reduction in the foundation 31 property tax levy under section 257.3, subsection 1 . If the 32 director approves a reduction in the foundation property tax 33 levy as provided in this section , the director shall notify the 34 director of the department of management of the reduction. 35 -1- LSB 1742XS (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 16 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 1 retroactively to January 1, 2025. 2